en: Plant Stands
xx: Plant Stands
cs: Stojany na květiny
da: Planteborde
de: Pflanzenständer
es: Soportes para macetas
fr: Supports pour plantes
it: Supporti per piante
ja: フラワースタンド
nl: Plantenstaanders
no: Plantestativer
pl: Kwietniki
pt: Suportes para vasos
ru: Подставки для растений
sv: Växtställ
tr: Bitki Stantları

en: Pot & Planter Liners
xx: Pot & Planter Liners
cs: Vložky do květináčů
da: Plantepotter
de: Pflanzeinsätze für Blumentöpfe und -kübel
es: Recipientes para macetas y sembradoras
fr: Pots en plastique
it: Fodere per vasi per piante e fiori
ja: 植木鉢/プランター用中敷
nl: Binnenbekleding voor bloempotten en -bakken
no: Potter og potteskjulere
pl: Wkładki do doniczek
pt: Vasos plásticos simples para cachepôs e jardineiras
ru: Вставки для цветочных горшков
sv: Insats för krukor och planteringar
tr: Saksı ve Çiçeklik Astarları

en: Pots & Planters
xx: Pots & Planters
cs: Koflíky a sazečky
da: Plantekrukker
de: Blumentöpfe & Pflanzgefäße
es: Macetas y tiestos
fr: Pots et cache-pots, Pot de fleurs
it: Vasi e fioriere
ja: 植木鉢・プランター
nl: Potten
no: Potter og kasser
pl: Doniczki i osłonki
pt: Potes
ru: Горшки и кадки
sv: Krukor och växtbehållare
tr: Saksılar ve Tohum Makineleri

en: Rain Barrels
xx: Rain Barrels
cs: Sudy na dešťovou vodu
da: Regntønder
de: Regenfässer
es: Barriles de lluvia
fr: Récupérateurs d'eau de pluie
it: Contenitori per raccolta pioggia
ja: 天水桶
nl: Regentonnen
no: Regntønner
pl: Zbiorniki na deszczówkę
pt: Tanques de chuva
ru: Бочки для дождевой воды
sv: Regntunnor
tr: Yağmur Varilleri

en: Sands & Soils
xx: Sands & Soils
cs: Písky a zeminy
da: Sand og jord
de: Sand & Gartenerde
es: Tierra y arena
fr: Sable et terreau
it: Sabbie e suoli
ja: 砂・土
nl: Zand en grond
no: Sand og jord
pl: Piaski i gleby
pt: Areia e terra
ru: Песок и почва
sv: Jord och sand
tr: Kumlar ve Topraklar

en: Sand
xx: Sand
cs: Písek
da: Sand
de: Sand
es: Arena
fr: Sable
it: Sabbia
ja: 砂
nl: Zand
no: Sand
pl: Piasek
pt: Areia
ru: Песок
sv: Sand
tr: Kum

en: Soil
xx: Soil
cs: Hlína
da: Jord
de: Gartenerde
es: Tierra
fr: Terre
it: Terreno
ja: 土
nl: Potgrond
no: Jord
pl: Ziemia
pt: Terra
ru: Грунт для рассады
sv: Jord
tr: Toprak

en: Outdoor Living
xx: Outdoor Living
cs: Bydlení na zahradě
da: Udendørsliv
de: Garten & Balkon
es: Artículos de exterior
fr: Vie en extérieur
it: Vita all'aperto
ja: 屋外用家具・エクステリア
nl: Buitenleven
no: Utendørsliv
pl: Akcesoria ogrodowe
pt: Espaços residenciais externos
ru: Товары для садового участка
sv: Utomhusliv
tr: Ev Dışında Yaşam

en: Awning Accessories
xx: Awning Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k markýzám
da: Tilbehør til markiser
de: Markisen-Zubehör
es: Acessorios para toldos
fr: Accessoires pour stores extérieurs
it: Accessori per tende parasole
ja: 窓・ドア用オーニング関連小物
nl: Accessoires voor zonwering voor ramen en deuren
no: Tilbehør til markiser
pl: Akcesoria do markiz
pt: Acessórios de toldos para janelas e portas
ru: Приадлежности для дверных и оконных навесов
sv: Markistillbehör
tr: Pencere ve Kapı Tentesi Aksesuarları

en: Awnings
xx: Awnings
cs: Markýzy
da: Markiser
de: Markisen
es: Toldos
fr: Stores extérieurs
it: Tende parasole
ja: 窓・ドア用オーニング
nl: Zonwering voor ramen en deuren
no: Markiser
pl: Markizy
pt: Toldos para janelas e portas
ru: Дверные и оконные навесы
sv: Markiser
tr: Pencere ve Kapı Tenteleri

en: Hammock Parts & Accessories
xx: Hammock Parts & Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k houpacím sítím
da: Tilbehør til hængekøjer
de: Hängemattenzubehör
es: Accesorios para hamacas
fr: Accessoires et pièces pour hamacs
it: Componenti e accessori per amache
ja: ハンモック関連小物
nl: Onderdelen en accessoires voor hangmatten
no: Tilbehør og deler til hengekøyer
pl: Akcesoria i części do hamaków
pt: Acessórios para redes de descanso
ru: Детали и принадлежности для гамаков
sv: Tillbehör till hängmattor
tr: Hamak Parçaları ve Aksesuarları

en: Hammocks
xx: Hammocks
cs: Hamaky a houpací sítě
da: Hængekøjer
de: Hängematten
es: Hamacas
fr: Hamacs
it: Amache
ja: ハンモック
nl: Hangmatten
no: Hengekøyer
pl: Hamaki
pt: Redes de descanso
ru: Гамаки
sv: Hängmattor
tr: Hamaklar

en: Outdoor Blankets
xx: Outdoor Blankets
cs: Venkovní deky
da: Udendørstæpper
de: Outdoor-Decken
es: Protectores para exterior
fr: Couvertures d'extérieur
it: Plaid da picnic
ja: アウトドア用毛布・敷物
nl: Buitensportdekens
no: Utendørspledd
pl: Koce plażowe
pt: Mantas para uso ao ar livre
ru: Уличные одеяла
sv: Utomhusfiltar
tr: Ev Dışı Battaniyeler

en: Beach Mats
xx: Beach Mats
cs: Plážové podložky
da: Strandtæpper
de: Strandmatten
es: Esteras de playa
fr: Tapis de plage
it: Stuoie da spiaggia
ja: ビーチマット
nl: Strandmatten
no: Strandmatter
pl: Maty plażowe
pt: Esteiras de praia
ru: Пляжные коврики
sv: Strandmattor
tr: Deniz Hasırları

en: Picnic Blankets
xx: Picnic Blankets
cs: Piknikové deky
da: Picnictæpper
de: Picknickdecken
es: Mantas de picnic
fr: Couvertures de pique-nique
it: Coperte da picnic
ja: レジャーシート
nl: Picknickdekens
no: Pikniktepper
pl: Koce piknikowe
pt: Toalhas de piquenique
ru: Одеяла для пикников
sv: Picknickfiltar
tr: Piknik Battaniyeleri

en: Poncho Liners
xx: Poncho Liners
cs: Celty
da: Varmetæpper
de: Poncholiner
es: Poncho de exterior
fr: Poncho liners
it: Fodere per coperte
ja: ポンチョライナー
nl: Poncho liners
no: Poncho-linere
pl: Pałatki
pt: Forros de poncho
ru: Спальный мешок –пончо
sv: Ponchofiltar
tr: Panço Yağmurlukları

en: Outdoor Structures
xx: Outdoor Structures
cs: Zahradní architektura
da: Udendørskonstruktioner
de: Gartenhäuschen & Gartenbauten
es: Estructuras de exteriores
fr: Structures extérieures
it: Strutture da esterno
ja: エクステリア
nl: Buitengebouwen
no: Utendørsstrukturer
pl: Architektura ogrodowa
pt: Estruturas externas
ru: Садовые конструкции
sv: Utomhusbyggnader
tr: Dış Mekan Yapıları

en: Canopies & Gazebos
xx: Canopies & Gazebos
cs: Markýzy a altány
da: Baldakiner og lysthuse
de: Pavillons & Gartenlauben
es: Pabellones y cenadores
fr: Auvents et abris
it: Baldacchini e gazebi
ja: キャノピー・ガゼボ
nl: Luifels en tuinhuisjes
no: Soltak og paviljonger
pl: Zadaszenia i altany
pt: Capotas e toldos
ru: Навесы и беседки
sv: Tält och lusthus
tr: Çardaklar ve Kamelyalar

en: Canopy & Gazebo Accessories
xx: Canopy & Gazebo Accessories
cs: Přístřešky a altány – příslušenství
da: Baldakiner og lysthuse – tilbehør
de: Pavillon-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para pabellones y cenadores
fr: Accessoires pour auvents et abris
it: Accessori per baldacchini e gazebo
ja: キャノピー・ガゼボ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor luifels en prieeltjes
no: Tilbehør til soltak og paviljonger
pl: Akcesoria do altan i tarasów
pt: Acessórios para dosséis e gazebos
ru: Принадлежности для навесов и беседок
sv: Tillbehör till tält och lusthus
tr: Çardak ve Kamelya Aksesuarları

en: Canopy & Gazebo Enclosure Kits
xx: Canopy & Gazebo Enclosure Kits
cs: Stínicí a krycí plachty na přístřešky a altány
da: Baldakiner og lysthuse – afskærmning
de: Seitenwand-Sets für Pavillons
es: Kits de pantalla para toldos y cenadores
fr: Kits de fermeture pour auvents et abris
it: Kit zanzariere per baldacchini e gazebo
ja: キャノピー・ガゼボ用スクリーンキット
nl: Afsluitsets voor luifels en prieeltjes
no: Skjermingssett til soltak og lysthus
pl: Zestawy ścianek do altan i tarasów
pt: Kits para dosséis e gazebos
ru: Наборы перегородок для навесов и беседок
sv: Skärmkit till baldakiner och lusthus
tr: Çardak ve Kamelya Perde Setleri